Indiana, session 2026, HB1036.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 31-25-2-11.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11.1. Subject to IC 31-33-8-7, the
department shall have direct in-person contact with an alleged
victim of child abuse or neglect not more than thirty (30) days
before the department:
(1) concludes an assessment under IC 31-33; or
(2) dismisses or terminates a child in need of services case
pending before a juvenile court.
HEA 1036 — Concur

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1036 — Concur